Maryland, session 2025, HB1446.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–758.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1446*

HOUSE BILL 1446
(3) “QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITY” MEANS A BUSINESS ENTITY THAT
MAINTAINS ITS HEADQUARTERS AND BASE OF OPERATIONS IN ANOTHER STATE.
(4) “SECRETARY” MEANS THE SECRETARY OF COMMERCE.
(B) FOR A TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2024, BUT
BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2030, A QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITY MAY CLAIM A CREDIT
AGAINST THE STATE INCOME TAX IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT STATED IN
THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE APPROVED BY THE SECRETARY FOR RELOCATING TO
THE STATE.
(C) TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR A TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION, A QUALIFIED
BUSINESS ENTITY SHALL SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT AN APPLICATION THAT
DEMONSTRATES:
(1) THAT THE QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITY’S HOME STATE, THROUGH
OFFICIAL STATE ACTION, HAS ADOPTED A NEW PUBLIC POLICY POSITION THAT:
(I) POSES A POSSIBLE HUMANITARIAN CRISIS BASED ON
POLITICAL OR PERSONAL BELIEFS FOR THE RESIDENTS OF THE QUALIFIED
BUSINESS ENTITY’S HOME STATE;
(II) ADVERSELY AFFECTS OR THREATENS THE ECONOMIC OR
SOCIAL LIVELIHOOD AND WELL–BEING OF THE QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITY’S
EMPLOYEES AND THEIR FAMILIES; AND
(III) ADVERSELY AFFECTS OR THREATENS THE QUALIFIED
BUSINESS ENTITY REGARDING WORK THAT THE QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITY
PERFORMS TO SPECIFICALLY ASSIST UNDERSERVED OR HISTORICALLY
UNDERREPRESENTED COMMUNITIES AND OTHER SIMILARLY SITUATED GROUPS;
AND
(2) THAT THE QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITY:
(I) IS RECEIVING A FINANCIAL INCENTIVE IN ITS HOME STATE,
SUCH AS AN INCOME TAX CREDIT, A GRANT, A LOW INTEREST LOAN, OR OTHER
SIMILAR INCENTIVE;
(II) INTENDS TO RELOCATE IMMINENTLY OR HAS RECENTLY
RELOCATED ITS HEADQUARTERS AND BASE OF OPERATIONS TO THE STATE AS A
RESULT OF THE SITUATION DESCRIBED IN ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND

HOUSE BILL 1446 3
(III) IS COMMITTED TO MAINTAINING ITS HEADQUARTERS AND
BASE OF OPERATIONS IN THE STATE FOR AT LEAST 2 YEARS AFTER THE DATE THAT
THE QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITY RELOCATES OR SUBMITS THE APPLICATION FOR
THE TAX CREDIT, WHICHEVER OCCURS LATER.
(D) WHEN REVIEWING AN APPLICATION UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH A DEADLINE BY WHICH A QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITY
THAT INTENDS TO RELOCATE TO THE STATE MUST COMPLETE THE RELOCATION;
(2) DETERMINE WHETHER THE QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITY IS
RECEIVING OR WAS RECEIVING IMMEDIATELY BEFORE RELOCATING TO THE STATE
ANY FINANCIAL INCENTIVES IN ITS HOME STATE; AND
(3) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E)(1) OF THIS SECTION AND ANY
OTHER REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT, ISSUE A TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE IN AN AMOUNT THAT, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, IS COMPARABLE
TO THE FINANCIAL INCENTIVES DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(E) THE SECRETARY SHALL:
(1) ANNUALLY SET A LIMITATION ON THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT OF
TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES THAT MAY BE ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(2) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
(F) IF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION IN ANY TAXABLE YEAR
EXCEEDS THE QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITY’S STATE INCOME TAX FOR THAT
TAXABLE YEAR, ANY UNUSED CREDIT AMOUNT MAY BE CARRIED FORWARD TO THE
IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING TAXABLE YEAR.
(G) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REVOKE ITS CERTIFICATION OF A CREDIT
UNDER THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, IF:
(I) ANY REPRESENTATION IN CONNECTION WITH THE
APPLICATION FOR THE CERTIFICATION IS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO
HAVE BEEN FALSE WHEN MADE; OR
(II) THE QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITY FAILS TO RELOCATE TO
THE STATE AS INDICATED.

HOUSE BILL 1446
(2) THE COMPTROLLER MAY MAKE AN ASSESSMENT AGAINST THE
QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITY TO RECAPTURE ANY AMOUNT OF THE TAX CREDIT
THAT THE BUSINESS HAS CLAIMED.
(H) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2028, THE SECRETARY SHALL REPORT TO
THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES ISSUED
UNDER THIS SECTION AND THE STATUS OF ANY QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITY THAT
RECEIVED A CREDIT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) There is a Business Relocation Council.
(b) The Council consists of the following members:
(1) the Secretary of Commerce, or the Secretary’s designee;
(2) the Comptroller, or the Comptroller’s designee; and
(3) the Secretary of Labor, or the Secretary’s designee.
(c) The Secretary of Commerce, or the Secretary’s designee, shall be the chair of
the Council.
(d) The Department of Commerce shall provide staff for the Council.
(e) A member of the Council:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Council; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Council shall:
(1) advertise the income tax credit established under § 10–758 of the
Tax – General Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, to other states nationwide; and
(2) establish, as necessary, subcommittees consisting of members of the
Council, experts in fields related to business relocation issues, and interested parties to
address or study specific issues pertaining to the Council’s duties.
(g) On or before December 31, 2028, the Council shall report on its efforts to the
Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General
Assembly.

HOUSE BILL 1446 5
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, but
before January 1, 2030. It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of
June 30, 2030, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.